Washington statutes.
RCW 10.64.140

Loss of voting rights—Acknowledgment.

(1) When a person is convicted of a felony and sentenced to a term of total confinement under the jurisdiction of the department of corrections, the court shall require the defendant to sign a statement acknowledging that:

(a) The defendant's right to vote has been lost due to the felony conviction and sentence to a term of total confinement;

(b) If the defendant is registered to vote, the voter registration will be canceled;

(c) The right to vote is automatically restored as long as the defendant is not serving a sentence of total confinement under the jurisdiction of the department of corrections;

(d) The defendant must reregister before voting; and

(e) Voting before the right is restored is a class C felony under RCW 29A.84.660.

(2) For the purposes of this section:

(a) A sentence of total confinement does not include confinement imposed as a sanction for a community custody violation under RCW 9.94A.633(1).

(b) "Total confinement" has the same meaning as in RCW 9.94A.030.

[ 2021 c 10 s 5; 2009 c 325 s 5; 2005 c 246 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2021 c 10: See note following RCW 29A.08.520.

Effective date—2005 c 246: "This act takes effect January 1, 2006." [ 2005 c 246 s 26.]